lez_num.lexd
PATTERNS
(Base | Teens | Ten | Tens | Thousand) [<num>:] NumAbs?
(Base | Teens | Ten | Tens | Thousand) [<num>:] (NumErg (NumInfl | (NumInflEssive (Elative | Directive)?))?)?
TensAdd [<num>] Add
Hundred [<num>]

LEXICON Base
сад # 1
кьвед #  2
пуд # 3
кьуд # 4
вад # 5
ругуд # 6
ирид # 7
муьжуьд # 8
кӀуьд # 9

LEXICON Teens
цӀусад # 11
цӀикьвед # 12
цӀипуд # 13
цӀукьуд # 14
цӀувад # 15
цӀуругуд # 16
цӀеирид # 17
цӀемуьжуьд # 18
цӀекӀуьд # 19

LEXICON Ten
цӀуд # 10

LEXICON Tens
къад # 20
яхцӀур # 40
пудкъад # 60
кьудкъад # 80

LEXICON TensAdd
къад:къан # 20
яхцӀур:яхцӀур # 40
пудкъад:пудкъан # 60
кьудкъад:кьудкъан # 80

LEXICON Add
<add>:ни

LEXICON Hundred
виш #100

LEXICON Thousand
агъзур # 1000

LEXICON NumAbs
<abs>: 
<abs><pl>:ар
<abs><pl>:бур

LEXICON NumErg
<erg>:а 
<pl><erg>:ри
<pl><erg>:буру

LEXICON NumInfl
<gen>:н
<dat>:з

LEXICON Elative
<elative>:ай

LEXICON Directive
<directive>:ди

LEXICON NumInflEssive
<ad><essive>:в
<post><essive>:хъ
<sub><essive>:к
<in><essive>:а 
<super><essive>:л
